Oklahoma, session 2025, SB479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 345, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 345. A. In addition to any other authorization


provided by law, the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority is


authorized to issue obligations to acquire real property, together


with improvements located thereon, and personal property to


construct improvements to real property and to provide funding for


repairs, refurbishments and improvements to real and personal


property of the State Capitol Building in a total amount not to


exceed One Hundred Twenty Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00). The



Req. No. 606 Page 1


funds shall be used for the renovation, repair and remodeling of the


State Capitol Building.


B. The Authority may hold title to the property and


improvements until such time as any obligations issued for this


purpose are retired or defeased and may lease the property and


improvements to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


Upon final redemption or defeasance of the obligations created


pursuant to this section, title to the property and improvements


shall be transferred from the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority


to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


C. For the purposes of paying the costs for construction of the


real property and improvements, and providing funding for the


project authorized in subsection A of this section, and for the


purpose authorized in subsection D of this section, the Authority is


hereby authorized to borrow monies on the credit of the income and


revenues to be derived from the leasing of such property and


improvements and, in anticipation of the collection of such income


and revenues, to issue negotiable obligations in a total amount not


to exceed One Hundred Twenty Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00)


whether issued in one or more series. The Authority is authorized


to capitalize interest on the obligations issued pursuant to this


section for a period of not to exceed one (1) year from the date of


issuance. For subsequent fiscal years, it is the intent of the


Legislature to appropriate to the Office of Management and

Req. No. 606 Page 2


Enterprise Services sufficient monies to make rental payments for


the purpose of retiring the obligations created pursuant to this


section. To the extent funds are available from the proceeds of the


borrowing authorized by this subsection, the Oklahoma Capitol


Improvement Authority shall provide for the payment of professional


fees and associated costs related to the project authorized in


subsection A of this section.


D. The Authority may issue obligations in one or more series


and in conjunction with other issues of the Authority. The


Authority is authorized to hire bond counsel, financial consultants,


and such other professionals as it may deem necessary to provide for


the efficient sale of the obligations and may utilize a portion of


the proceeds of any borrowing to create such reserves as may be


deemed necessary and to pay costs associated with the issuance and


administration of such obligations.


E. The obligations authorized under this section may be sold at


either competitive or negotiated sale, as determined by the


Authority, and in such form and at such prices as may be authorized


by the Authority. The Authority may enter into agreements with such


credit enhancers and liquidity providers as may be determined


necessary to efficiently market the obligations. The obligations


may mature and have such provisions for redemption as shall be


determined by the Authority, but in no event shall the final



Req. No. 606 Page 3


maturity of such obligations occur later than ten (10) years from


the first principal maturity date.


F. Any interest earnings on funds or accounts created for the


purposes of this section may be utilized as partial payment of the


annual debt service or for the purposes directed by the Authority.


G. The obligations issued under this section, the transfer


thereof and the interest earned on such obligations, including any


profit derived from the sale thereof, shall not be subject to


taxation of any kind by the State of Oklahoma this state, or by any


county, municipality or political subdivision therein.


H. The Authority may direct the investment of all monies in any


funds or accounts created in connection with the offering of the


obligations authorized under this section. Such investments shall


be made in a manner consistent with the investment guidelines of the


State Treasurer. The Authority may place additional restrictions on


the investment of such monies if necessary to enhance the


marketability of the obligations.


I. There is hereby created a State Capitol Repair Expenditure


Oversight Committee. The proceeds from the sale of obligations


issued pursuant to the provisions of this section and Section 1 of


Enrolled House Bill No. 3168 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma


Legislature that are needed for repairs to the interior and exterior


of the State Capitol shall be subject to the approval of the State


Capitol Repair Expenditure Oversight Committee; provided, however,

Req. No. 606 Page 4


the expenditure of those proceeds shall be subject to a request for


proposal process.


The Committee shall be composed of nine (9) members as follows:


1. Three persons to be appointed by the Governor, one of whom


shall serve as chair of the Committee;


2. Three legislators to be appointed by the Speaker of the


House of Representatives, two of whom shall be members of the


majority political party and one of whom shall be a member of the


minority political party; and


3. Three legislators to be appointed by the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, two of whom shall be members of the majority


political party and one of whom shall be a member of the minority


political party. Five members of the Committee shall constitute a


quorum and the vote of five members shall be necessary for any


action taken by the Committee. The Committee shall be staffed by


employees of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. The


Committee shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.


J. The Committee shall deliver a preliminary plan for the


renovation, repair and remodeling of the State Capitol to the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services no


later than December 31, 2014. The preliminary plan shall include


the following components:


1. Establishment of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services’ goal and criteria for use by the vendor; and

Req. No. 606 Page 5


2. Selection criteria for the design-build team vendor to be


selected through a Request For Proposal process.


K. Following receipt of the preliminary plan as approved by the


Committee, the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall


solicit Requests For Proposals to select the vendor for the project.


L. The Committee shall deliver a final plan to the Director of


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services no later than June


30, 2015. The final plan shall include the following components:


1. Approval of the final scope of work developed by the vendor;


and


2. Approval of the project phasing developed by the vendor.


M. Following delivery of the final plan, the Committee shall


continue to oversee the expenditure of proceeds from the sale of


obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of this section and


Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 3168 of the 2nd Session of the


55th Legislature, until completion of the renovation, repair and


remodeling of the State Capitol. The Committee may also propose and


approve amendments to the plan as it deems appropriate.


N. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall have responsibility to substantially implement the


plan as presented by the Committee; provided, the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives


shall approve all proposed designs related to renovation, repair and


remodeling of space within the State Capitol Building under the

Req. No. 606 Page 6


management and control of the Legislature and allocated to that


officer’s house of the Legislature pursuant to the provisions of


Section 15.1 of this title, and any subsequent changes to such


plans. Joint approval of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be required


for such plans for space under the management and control of the


Legislature and not allocated to a specific house of the


Legislature. Such approval shall be in writing.


O. Insofar as they are not in conflict with the provisions of


this section, the provisions of Section 151 et seq. of this title


shall apply to this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 73 O.S. 2021, Section 346, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 346. A. In addition to any other authorization


provided by law, the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority is


authorized to issue obligations to acquire real property, together


with improvements located thereon, and personal property to


construct improvements to real property and to provide funding for


repairs, refurbishments and improvements to real and personal


property of the State Capitol Building and associated furniture,


fixtures and equipment in a total amount not to exceed One Hundred


Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00). The funds shall be


used for the renovation, repair and remodeling of the State Capitol


Building.

Req. No. 606 Page 7


B. The Authority may hold title to the property and


improvements until such time as any obligations issued for this


purpose are retired or defeased and may lease the property and


improvements to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


Upon final redemption or defeasance of the obligations created


pursuant to this section, title to the property and improvements


shall be transferred from the Oklahoma Capitol Improvement Authority


to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


C. For the purposes of paying the costs for construction of the


real property and improvements, and providing funding for the


project authorized in subsection A of this section, and for the


purpose authorized in subsection D of this section, the Authority is


hereby authorized to borrow monies on the credit of the income and


revenues to be derived from the leasing of such property and


improvements and, in anticipation of the collection of such income


and revenues, to issue negotiable obligations in a total amount not


to exceed One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00)


whether issued in one or more series. The Authority is authorized


to capitalize interest on the obligations issued pursuant to this


section for a period of not to exceed one (1) year from the date of


issuance. For subsequent fiscal years, it is the intent of the


Legislature to appropriate to the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services sufficient monies to make rental payments for


the purpose of retiring the obligations created pursuant to this

Req. No. 606 Page 8


section. To the extent funds are available from the proceeds of the


borrowing authorized by this subsection, the Oklahoma Capitol


Improvement Authority shall provide for the payment of professional


fees and associated costs related to the project authorized in


subsection A of this section; provided, that no such fees or costs


may be paid if such payments would jeopardize the tax-advantaged


status of the bonds under federal law.


D. The Authority may issue obligations in one or more series


and in conjunction with other issues of the Authority. The


Authority is authorized to hire bond counsel, financial consultants,


and such other professionals as it may deem necessary to provide for


the efficient sale of the obligations and may utilize a portion of


the proceeds of any borrowing to create such reserves as may be


deemed necessary and to pay costs associated with the issuance and


administration of such obligations.


E. The obligations authorized under this section may be sold at


either competitive or negotiated sale, as determined by the


Authority, and in such form and at such prices as may be authorized


by the Authority. The Authority may enter into agreements with such


credit enhancers and liquidity providers as may be determined


necessary to efficiently market the obligations. The obligations


may mature and have such provisions for redemption as shall be


determined by the Authority, but in no event shall the final


maturity of such obligations occur later than twenty (20) years from

Req. No. 606 Page 9


the first principal maturity date. The first principal maturity


date for each series of bonds sold under this authorization shall


occur no later than eighteen (18) months from its delivery date. No


bonds shall be delivered prior to July 1, 2018.


F. Any interest earnings on funds or accounts created for the


purposes of this section may be utilized as partial payment of the


annual debt service or for the purposes directed by the Authority.


G. The obligations issued under this section, the transfer


thereof and the interest earned on such obligations, including any


profit derived from the sale thereof, shall not be subject to


taxation of any kind by the State of Oklahoma this state, or by any


county, municipality or political subdivision therein.


H. The Authority may direct the investment of all monies in any


funds or accounts created in connection with the offering of the


obligations authorized under this section. Such investments shall


be made in a manner consistent with the investment guidelines of the


State Treasurer. The Authority may place additional restrictions on


the investment of such monies if necessary to enhance the


marketability of the obligations.


I. The proceeds from the sale of obligations issued pursuant to


the provisions of this section that are needed for repairs,


refurbishments and improvements to real and personal property of the


State Capitol Building, and associated furniture, fixtures and


equipment for the State Capitol shall be subject to the approval of

Req. No. 606 Page 10


the State Capitol Repair Expenditure Oversight Committee created


pursuant to Section 345 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


J. Insofar as they are not in conflict with the provisions of


this section, the provisions of Section 151 et seq. of Title 73 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title shall apply to this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-606 RD 1/19/2025 5:37:12 AM

































Req. No. 606 Page 11